Washington statutes.
RCW 5.48.040

Hearing on application—Evidence.

Upon the hearing of the application provided in RCW 5.48.030, the court may admit in evidence oral testimony and any complete or partial abstract of such record, docket entries or indices, and any other written evidence of the contents or effect of such records and published reports concerning such actions or proceedings, when the court is of opinion that such abstracts, writings and publications were fairly and honestly made before the loss of such records occurred.

[ 1890 p 339 s 4; RRS s 1273.]